Alaska, session 34, SB65.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 39.52 is amended by adding a new section to read: 04 Sec. 39.52.165. Representation of public officers. The Department of Law, 05 including the attorney general, may not represent or advise the governor, the lieutenant 06 governor, or another public officer or former public officer in a matter in which that 07 public officer or former public officer is the subject of a complaint filed under this 08 chapter. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.